Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1720
Professional services; selection process; notice; when not required.

Notwithstanding any other provision of sections 81-1701 to 81-1721, there shall be no public notice requirement or utilization of the selection process as provided in sections 81-1701 to 81-1721 for projects in which the agency is able to reuse existing drawings, specifications, and other documents from a prior project.

Laws 1978, LB 715, § 20.